Utah, session 2026, SB44.
Section 1. Section 63L-10-103 is amended to read:63L-10-103. Statewide resource management plan adopted.(1)(a)The statewide resource management plan, dated May 7, 2025May 6, 2026, and on file with the office, is adopted.(b)The plan described in Subsection (1)(a) replaces and supersedes the plan dated January 8, 2024May 7, 2025.(2)The office shall, to the extent possible and as funding allows, monitor federal, state, and local government compliance with the plan.(3)(a)If the office finds the need to modify the plan, the office shall notify the commission of the modification and the office's reasoning for the modification.(b)The office shall coordinate with the commission to discuss policy direction and to draft any modifications to the plan.(4)(a)The commission may request additional information of the office regarding any modifications to the plan, as described in Subsection (3).(b)The office shall promptly respond to any request for additional information, as described in Subsection (4)(a).(c)The commission may make a recommendation that the Legislature approve a modification or disapprove a modification, or the commission may decline to take action.(5)The office shall annually:(a)prepare a report detailing any modifications the office recommends for the plan and deliver the report to the commission before August 31; and(b)report on the implementation of the plan at the federal, state, and local levels to the commission before August 31.(6)(a)If the commission makes a recommendation that the Legislature approve a modification to the plan, the commission shall prepare a bill in anticipation of the annual general session of the Legislature for approval of the modification.(b)A modification to the plan does not take effect until approved by the Legislature.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.